hunspell-en-ru/src/wiki_ru_RU.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2893 Y 1
SFX 2893 0 ватыми .
SFX 593 Y 1
SFX 593 0 ницах .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 нувших .
SFX 515 Y 1
SFX 515 0 щеюся .
SFX 1820 Y 1
SFX 1820 0 утся .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 0 ские .
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 ский .
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 0 ским .
SFX 1936 Y 1
SFX 1936 0 льность .
SFX 2808 Y 1
SFX 2808 0 ровавшись .
SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460 0 вавшему .
SFX 1804 Y 1
SFX 1804 0 нувшийся .
SFX 2628 Y 1
SFX 2628 0 тного .
SFX 2292 Y 1
SFX 2292 0 аемая .
SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 0 ив .
SFX 2441 Y 1
SFX 2441 0 ид .
SFX 286 Y 1
SFX 286 0 ие .
SFX 192 Y 1
SFX 192 0 ии .
SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 ий .
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 0 ик .
SFX 255 Y 1
SFX 255 0 ил .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 им .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 ин .
SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 0 ков .
SFX 2870 Y 1
SFX 2870 0 кое .
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 0 кой .
SFX 318 Y 1
SFX 318 0 ком .
SFX 2424 Y 1
SFX 2424 0 жей .
SFX 1724 Y 1
SFX 1724 0 рою .
SFX 2583 Y 1
SFX 2583 0 тная .
SFX 2138 Y 1
SFX 2138 0 озу .
SFX 2137 Y 1
SFX 2137 0 озы .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 щиками .
SFX 1750 Y 1
SFX 1750 0 ничаем .
SFX 349 Y 1
SFX 349 0 ились .
SFX 2759 Y 1
SFX 2759 0 ткою .
SFX 2194 Y 1
SFX 2194 0 ливая .
SFX 1621 Y 1
SFX 1621 0 ивавшись .
SFX 2181 Y 1
SFX 2181 0 тку .
SFX 1827 Y 1
SFX 1827 0 ату .
SFX 1391 Y 1
SFX 1391 0 аты .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 ать .
SFX 2012 Y 1
SFX 2012 0 овичах .
SFX 1962 Y 1
SFX 1962 0 изируете .
SFX 1797 Y 1
SFX 1797 0 уясь .
SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 0 ватою .
SFX 1017 Y 1
SFX 1017 0 овавшего .
SFX 2669 Y 1
SFX 2669 0 яешься .
SFX 2762 Y 1
SFX 2762 0 нта .
SFX 2883 Y 1
SFX 2883 0 нте .
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 0 нам .
SFX 51 Y 1
SFX 51 0 есь .
SFX 346 Y 1
SFX 346 0 еся .
SFX 239 Y 1
SFX 239 0 аться .
SFX 2398 Y 1
SFX 2398 0 нскими .
SFX 1008 Y 1
SFX 1008 0 овавших .
SFX 2177 Y 1
SFX 2177 0 чного .
SFX 2081 Y 1
SFX 2081 0 тками .
SFX 1823 Y 1
SFX 1823 0 ицах .
SFX 2771 Y 1
SFX 2771 0 изировавшись .
SFX 199 Y 1
SFX 199 0 щею .
SFX 1290 Y 1
SFX 1290 0 вого .
SFX 1693 Y 1
SFX 1693 0 инов .
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 0 иной .
SFX 1894 Y 1
SFX 1894 0 инок .
SFX 672 Y 1
SFX 672 0 ином .
SFX 1114 Y 1
SFX 1114 0 шкой .
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 0 ских .
SFX 2715 Y 1
SFX 2715 0 чив .
SFX 683 Y 1
SFX 683 0 чик .
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 0 чим .
SFX 261 Y 1
SFX 261 0 ается .
SFX 2803 Y 1
SFX 2803 0 роваться .
SFX 2986 Y 1
SFX 2986 0 рям .
SFX 2421 Y 1
SFX 2421 0 рна .
SFX 2629 Y 1
SFX 2629 0 рно .
SFX 1054 Y 1
SFX 1054 0 нные .
SFX 332 Y 1
SFX 332 0 нный .
SFX 1053 Y 1
SFX 1053 0 нным .
SFX 2697 Y 1
SFX 2697 0 ис .
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 0 ит .
SFX 801 Y 1
SFX 801 0 их .
SFX 1793 Y 1
SFX 1793 0 иц .
SFX 1196 Y 1
SFX 1196 0 ич .
SFX 2024 Y 1
SFX 2024 0 ищ .
SFX 191 Y 1
SFX 191 0 ию .
SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 0 ия .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 кою .
SFX 682 Y 1
SFX 682 0 ванием .
SFX 1749 Y 1
SFX 1749 0 ничает .
SFX 2187 Y 1
SFX 2187 0 ушкой .
SFX 2199 Y 1
SFX 2199 0 тые .
SFX 391 Y 1
SFX 391 0 тый .
SFX 2198 Y 1
SFX 2198 0 тым .
SFX 2414 Y 1
SFX 2414 0 лением .
SFX 929 Y 1
SFX 929 0 ьного .
SFX 1105 Y 1
SFX 1105 0 чками .
SFX 2720 Y 1
SFX 2720 0 товой .
SFX 1508 Y 1
SFX 1508 0 овскую .
SFX 2546 Y 1
SFX 2546 0 ологов .
SFX 2556 Y 1
SFX 2556 0 ологом .
SFX 2487 Y 1
SFX 2487 0 тите .
SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 0 аете .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 0 ера .
SFX 784 Y 1
SFX 784 0 ере .
SFX 1200 Y 1
SFX 1200 0 ивают .
SFX 447 Y 1
SFX 447 0 ника .
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 0 нике .
SFX 444 Y 1
SFX 444 0 ники .
SFX 2918 Y 1
SFX 2918 0 нту .
SFX 2810 Y 1
SFX 2810 0 нты .
SFX 382 Y 1
SFX 382 0 нах .
SFX 91 Y 1
SFX 91 0 ная .
SFX 2162 Y 1
SFX 2162 0 ялось .
SFX 2369 Y 1
SFX 2369 0 ающемся .
SFX 1675 Y 1
SFX 1675 0 ывавшие .
SFX 1298 Y 1
SFX 1298 0 ывавший .
SFX 1674 Y 1
SFX 1674 0 ывавшим .
SFX 1686 Y 1
SFX 1686 0 ёшь .
SFX 1768 Y 1
SFX 1768 0 овался .
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 0 лись .
SFX 1714 Y 1
SFX 1714 0 альна .
SFX 1696 Y 1
SFX 1696 0 ально .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 иною .
SFX 2617 Y 1
SFX 2617 0 шиной .
SFX 1132 Y 1
SFX 1132 0 шкою .
SFX 2858 Y 1
SFX 2858 0 рскую .
SFX 935 Y 1
SFX 935 0 евым .
SFX 1707 Y 1
SFX 1707 0 ивавшему .
SFX 1369 Y 1
SFX 1369 0 усь .
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272 0 уся .
SFX 2799 Y 1
SFX 2799 0 руешься .
SFX 2356 Y 1
SFX 2356 0 анную .
SFX 2593 Y 1
SFX 2593 0 чит .
SFX 1090 Y 1
SFX 1090 0 ируюсь .
SFX 912 Y 1
SFX 912 0 вшаяся .
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 0 аемся .
SFX 1578 Y 1
SFX 1578 0 исткам .
SFX 575 Y 1
SFX 575 0 иста .
SFX 729 Y 1
SFX 729 0 исте .
SFX 1848 Y 1
SFX 1848 0 исто .
SFX 2265 Y 1
SFX 2265 0 вами .
SFX 1979 Y 1
SFX 1979 0 ща .
SFX 1314 Y 1
SFX 1314 0 ще .
SFX 2240 Y 1
SFX 2240 0 щи .
SFX 835 Y 1
SFX 835 0 овка .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 овке .
SFX 1332 Y 1
SFX 1332 0 овки .
SFX 2795 Y 1
SFX 2795 0 руются .
SFX 2984 Y 1
SFX 2984 0 рях .
SFX 1264 Y 1
SFX 1264 0 ющее .
SFX 1263 Y 1
SFX 1263 0 ющей .
SFX 1257 Y 1
SFX 1257 0 ющем .
SFX 1412 Y 1
SFX 1412 0 за .
SFX 1718 Y 1
SFX 1718 0 зе .
SFX 2479 Y 1
SFX 2479 0 рны .
SFX 1051 Y 1
SFX 1051 0 нных .
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 0 лявший .
SFX 2386 Y 1
SFX 2386 0 ствовавшие .
SFX 1223 Y 1
SFX 1223 0 ствовавший .
SFX 2385 Y 1
SFX 2385 0 ствовавшим .
SFX 1934 Y 1
SFX 1934 0 льностям .
SFX 804 Y 1
SFX 804 0 ерами .
SFX 2493 Y 1
SFX 2493 0 кавши .
SFX 1685 Y 1
SFX 1685 0 ален .
SFX 910 Y 1
SFX 910 0 вшееся .
SFX 2186 Y 1
SFX 2186 0 ушкою .
SFX 536 Y 1
SFX 536 0 валось .
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 0 ита .
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 ите .
SFX 2188 Y 1
SFX 2188 0 тых .
SFX 1233 Y 1
SFX 1233 0 ствуй .
SFX 55 Y 1
SFX 55 0 ась .
SFX 1897 Y 1
SFX 1897 0 стому .
SFX 1480 Y 1
SFX 1480 0 тельную .
SFX 1484 Y 1
SFX 1484 0 онов .
SFX 1597 Y 1
SFX 1597 0 оном .
SFX 1520 Y 1
SFX 1520 0 ельна .
SFX 1433 Y 1
SFX 1433 0 ельно .
SFX 1189 Y 1
SFX 1189 0 ивала .
SFX 1180 Y 1
SFX 1180 0 ивали .
SFX 1188 Y 1
SFX 1188 0 ивало .
SFX 2109 Y 1
SFX 2109 0 бек .
SFX 773 Y 1
SFX 773 0 еру .
SFX 808 Y 1
SFX 808 0 еры .
SFX 452 Y 1
SFX 452 0 нику .
SFX 2205 Y 1
SFX 2205 0 ичностям .
SFX 1836 Y 1
SFX 1836 0 енную .
SFX 1139 Y 1
SFX 1139 0 ающему .
SFX 1672 Y 1
SFX 1672 0 ывавших .
SFX 2364 Y 1
SFX 2364 0 ающимся .
SFX 2086 Y 1
SFX 2086 0 ичные .
SFX 1668 Y 1
SFX 1668 0 ичный .
SFX 2085 Y 1
SFX 2085 0 ичным .
SFX 900 Y 1
SFX 900 0 измам .
SFX 276 Y 1
SFX 276 0 ности .
SFX 2647 Y 1
SFX 2647 0 торов .
SFX 2719 Y 1
SFX 2719 0 тором .
SFX 2234 Y 1
SFX 2234 0 явшее .
SFX 2233 Y 1
SFX 2233 0 явшей .
SFX 2232 Y 1
SFX 2232 0 явшем .
SFX 434 Y 1
SFX 434 0 ешься .
SFX 1354 Y 1
SFX 1354 0 ичей .
SFX 1405 Y 1
SFX 1405 0 ичем .
SFX 2191 Y 1
SFX 2191 0 ичен .
SFX 1713 Y 1
SFX 1713 0 альны .
SFX 603 Y 1
SFX 603 0 мый .
SFX 2999 Y 1
SFX 2999 0 ляюсь .
SFX 933 Y 1
SFX 933 0 евых .
SFX 1986 Y 1
SFX 1986 0 иваниям .
SFX 2652 Y 1
SFX 2652 0 ированными .
SFX 2286 Y 1
SFX 2286 0 аемому .
SFX 1576 Y 1
SFX 1576 0 истках .
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 0 исту .
SFX 579 Y 1
SFX 579 0 исты .
SFX 1399 Y 1
SFX 1399 0 ьщика .
SFX 1395 Y 1
SFX 1395 0 ьщике .
SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 0 ьщики .
SFX 208 Y 1
SFX 208 0 щего .
SFX 352 Y 1
SFX 352 0 ятся .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 ства .
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 0 стве .
SFX 426 Y 1
SFX 426 0 ство .
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 0 щемуся .
SFX 1954 Y 1
SFX 1954 0 щу .
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 0 овку .
SFX 1262 Y 1
SFX 1262 0 ющею .
SFX 1688 Y 1
SFX 1688 0 зу .
SFX 1782 Y 1
SFX 1782 0 зы .
SFX 1241 Y 1
SFX 1241 0 новым .
SFX 2601 Y 1
SFX 2601 0 ьней .
SFX 2383 Y 1
SFX 2383 0 ствовавших .
SFX 1932 Y 1
SFX 1932 0 льностях .
SFX 1348 Y 1
SFX 1348 0 ировавшего .
SFX 3000 Y 1
SFX 3000 0 лялся .
SFX 1661 Y 1
SFX 1661 0 ованием .
SFX 2857 Y 1
SFX 2857 0 тив .
SFX 2747 Y 1
SFX 2747 0 тик .
SFX 2678 Y 1
SFX 2678 0 тин .
SFX 1957 Y 1
SFX 1957 0 изируют .
SFX 2576 Y 1
SFX 2576 0 ара .
SFX 1993 Y 1
SFX 1993 0 аре .
SFX 886 Y 1
SFX 886 0 иту .
SFX 844 Y 1
SFX 844 0 иты .
SFX 263 Y 1
SFX 263 0 ить .
SFX 1426 Y 1
SFX 1426 0 ельными .
SFX 905 Y 1
SFX 905 0 вшиеся .
SFX 1231 Y 1
SFX 1231 0 ствую .
SFX 1244 Y 1
SFX 1244 0 ствуя .
SFX 1796 Y 1
SFX 1796 0 цией .
SFX 1093 Y 1
SFX 1093 0 ируешься .
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 0 чиков .
SFX 707 Y 1
SFX 707 0 чиком .
SFX 1438 Y 1
SFX 1438 0 овская .
SFX 1590 Y 1
SFX 1590 0 нём .
SFX 1519 Y 1
SFX 1519 0 ельны .
SFX 1898 Y 1
SFX 1898 0 нулось .
SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463 0 вавшее .
SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 0 вавшей .
SFX 461 Y 1
SFX 461 0 вавшем .
SFX 1199 Y 1
SFX 1199 0 ивающий .
SFX 440 Y 1
SFX 440 0 вают .
SFX 2203 Y 1
SFX 2203 0 ичностях .
SFX 2915 Y 1
SFX 2915 0 ологический .
SFX 311 Y 1
SFX 311 0 ости .
SFX 2083 Y 1
SFX 2083 0 ичных .
SFX 898 Y 1
SFX 898 0 измах .
SFX 726 Y 1
SFX 726 0 ировав .
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 0 ировал .
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 0 ирован .
SFX 274 Y 1
SFX 274 0 ность .
SFX 2623 Y 1
SFX 2623 0 тными .
SFX 2230 Y 1
SFX 2230 0 явшею .
SFX 218 Y 1
SFX 218 0 авшими .
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 0 ностью .
SFX 2830 Y 1
SFX 2830 0 рская .
SFX 2289 Y 1
SFX 2289 0 аемое .
SFX 2288 Y 1
SFX 2288 0 аемой .
SFX 2287 Y 1
SFX 2287 0 аемом .
SFX 2325 Y 1
SFX 2325 0 анная .
SFX 1779 Y 1
SFX 1779 0 истую .
SFX 1984 Y 1
SFX 1984 0 иваниях .
SFX 2507 Y 1
SFX 2507 0 кавший .
SFX 296 Y 1
SFX 296 0 вала .
SFX 298 Y 1
SFX 298 0 вали .
SFX 303 Y 1
SFX 303 0 вало .
SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 0 овые .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 0 овый .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 овым .
SFX 2607 Y 1
SFX 2607 0 тное .
SFX 2582 Y 1
SFX 2582 0 тной .
SFX 2606 Y 1
SFX 2606 0 тном .
SFX 757 Y 1
SFX 757 0 ша .
SFX 950 Y 1
SFX 950 0 ше .
SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 0 ши .
SFX 2368 Y 1
SFX 2368 0 ающемуся .
SFX 2701 Y 1
SFX 2701 0 аков .
SFX 1699 Y 1
SFX 1699 0 жа .
SFX 2220 Y 1
SFX 2220 0 же .
SFX 1841 Y 1
SFX 1841 0 жи .
SFX 1392 Y 1
SFX 1392 0 ьщику .
SFX 431 Y 1
SFX 431 0 ству .
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 0 овавши .
SFX 2013 Y 1
SFX 2013 0 овичами .
SFX 2068 Y 1
SFX 2068 0 ациям .
SFX 1239 Y 1
SFX 1239 0 новых .
SFX 1650 Y 1
SFX 1650 0 уетесь .
SFX 456 Y 1
SFX 456 0 вавшими .
SFX 2362 Y 1
SFX 2362 0 ающуюся .
SFX 2473 Y 1
SFX 2473 0 авшейся .
SFX 482 Y 1
SFX 482 0 цам .
SFX 2520 Y 1
SFX 2520 0 тит .
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 0 ствам .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 овалось .
SFX 2331 Y 1
SFX 2331 0 ьщицей .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 ившись .
SFX 1798 Y 1
SFX 1798 0 циею .
SFX 1342 Y 1
SFX 1342 0 ировавшие .
SFX 724 Y 1
SFX 724 0 ировавший .
SFX 1341 Y 1
SFX 1341 0 ировавшим .
SFX 763 Y 1
SFX 763 0 очек .
SFX 1571 Y 1
SFX 1571 0 очен .
SFX 1483 Y 1
SFX 1483 0 тельная .
SFX 1667 Y 1
SFX 1667 0 ена .
SFX 2751 Y 1
SFX 2751 0 ено .
SFX 1664 Y 1
SFX 1664 0 нёт .
SFX 1479 Y 1
SFX 1479 0 анам .
SFX 2882 Y 1
SFX 2882 0 ркам .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 0 изировалась .
SFX 2779 Y 1
SFX 2779 0 цева .
SFX 2778 Y 1
SFX 2778 0 цеве .
SFX 1183 Y 1
SFX 1183 0 телями .
SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 0 мтесь .
SFX 2708 Y 1
SFX 2708 0 ющеюся .
SFX 459 Y 1
SFX 459 0 вавшею .
SFX 1360 Y 1
SFX 1360 0 иваемый .
SFX 1398 Y 1
SFX 1398 0 ьщикам .
SFX 2388 Y 1
SFX 2388 0 ствовавшему .
SFX 2610 Y 1
SFX 2610 0 кайте .
SFX 1838 Y 1
SFX 1838 0 енная .
SFX 310 Y 1
SFX 310 0 ость .
SFX 1613 Y 1
SFX 1613 0 ываешься .
SFX 1729 Y 1
SFX 1729 0 гам .
SFX 706 Y 1
SFX 706 0 чика .
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 0 чике .
SFX 709 Y 1
SFX 709 0 чики .
SFX 976 Y 1
SFX 976 0 нувшее .
SFX 975 Y 1
SFX 975 0 нувшей .
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 0 нувшем .
SFX 1146 Y 1
SFX 1146 0 лами .
SFX 266 Y 1
SFX 266 0 аетесь .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 авшийся .
SFX 2155 Y 1
SFX 2155 0 чные .
SFX 1463 Y 1
SFX 1463 0 чный .
SFX 2153 Y 1
SFX 2153 0 чным .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 нтам .
SFX 723 Y 1
SFX 723 0 истам .
SFX 2285 Y 1
SFX 2285 0 аемою .
SFX 2151 Y 1
SFX 2151 0 чными .
SFX 1604 Y 1
SFX 1604 0 ывающийся .
SFX 1294 Y 1
SFX 1294 0 изациями .
SFX 2461 Y 1
SFX 2461 0 ившейся .
SFX 2023 Y 1
SFX 2023 0 ищам .
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 0 ьей .
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 0 ьем .
SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 овых .
SFX 2605 Y 1
SFX 2605 0 тною .
SFX 2815 Y 1
SFX 2815 0 лявши .
SFX 1670 Y 1
SFX 1670 0 вка .
SFX 2554 Y 1
SFX 2554 0 вке .
SFX 2494 Y 1
SFX 2494 0 вки .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 0 шу .
SFX 106 Y 1
SFX 106 0 шь .
SFX 2357 Y 1
SFX 2357 0 аемтесь .
SFX 931 Y 1
SFX 931 0 нешь .
SFX 1285 Y 1
SFX 1285 0 жу .
SFX 1637 Y 1
SFX 1637 0 ивавшийся .
SFX 2649 Y 1
SFX 2649 0 торами .
SFX 667 Y 1
SFX 667 0 выми .
SFX 2066 Y 1
SFX 2066 0 ациях .
SFX 2064 Y 1
SFX 2064 0 лками .
SFX 608 Y 1
SFX 608 0 ваетесь .
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 0 итами .
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 цах .
SFX 574 Y 1
SFX 574 0 ист .
SFX 47 Y 1
SFX 47 0 ись .
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 ися .
